Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.110

Classification of roads for which no public expenditures made—Compensation of county.

Any board of county commissioners may, by ordinance, separately classify county roads for which no public expenditures have been made in the acquisition, improvement or maintenance of the same, according to the nature of the county's property interest in the road; and may require persons benefiting from the vacation of county roads within some or all of the said classes to compensate the county as a condition precedent to the vacation thereof.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 5.]